Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1066
Energy financing contract; terms.

An energy financing contract may extend beyond the fiscal year in which it becomes effective and shall allow the governmental unit to cancel the contract for the nonappropriation of funds. An obligation created by an energy financing contract entered into or indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section shall not constitute or give rise to an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional, statutory, or board debt limitation.

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 13.